District of Columbia statutes.
44-1403

Sale of products; disposition of proceeds.

The Superintendent of the said institution may sell such of the farm, greenhouse, and garden products, and the products of the industrial shops as may not be required in the maintenance and conduct of the home and school, and the funds so secured shall be paid into the Treasury of the United States to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1135, ch. 460, § 5
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-803.
1973 Ed., § 32-606.